Oklahoma, session 2026, SB25.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1913, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 17, 1st Extraordinary Session, O.S.L.


2023 (69 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 1913), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 1913. There is hereby established a fund within the


State Treasury to be known as the “Rural Economic Transportation


Reliability and Optimization Fund” to be administered by the


Oklahoma Department of Transportation. The fund shall be a


continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall

Req. No. 392 Page 1


consist of any general revenues as may be directly appropriated or


otherwise provided by law.


Any monies appropriated to the Rural Economic Transportation


Reliability and Optimization Fund shall not result in a decrease in


historic and traditional total state transportation funding levels


or be used to supplant or replace existing state funds used for


transportation purposes.


In order to ensure that the funds from the Rural Economic


Transportation Reliability and Optimization Fund are used to enhance


and not supplant state funding for the Department of Transportation,


the State Board of Equalization shall examine and investigate the


funding levels as described. At the meeting of the State Board of


Equalization held within five (5) days after the monthly


apportionment in February of each year, the State Board of


Equalization shall issue a finding and report which shall state


whether expenditures from the Rural Economic Transportation


Reliability and Optimization Fund were used to enhance or supplant


state funding for the Department of Transportation. If the State


Board of Equalization finds that state funding for the Department of


Transportation was supplanted by funds from the Rural Economic


Transportation Reliability and Optimization Fund, the Board shall


specify the amount by which such funding was supplanted. In this


event, the Legislature shall not make any appropriations for the



Req. No. 392 Page 2


ensuing fiscal year until an appropriation in that amount is made to


replenish state funding for the Department of Transportation.


All monies accruing to the credit of the Rural Economic


Transportation Reliability and Optimization Fund are hereby


appropriated and shall be used to assist the Department in the


equitable prioritization of construction, repair, and maintenance of


state highways in rural areas where robust economic development has


resulted in traffic safety and circulation difficulties attributed


to significant and unanticipated increases in traffic volumes and as


fully recorded and documented by the Department. “Robust economic


development”, as used in this act section, shall mean those


conditions of the highways of this state in counties with a


population of less than seventy-five thousand (75,000) fifty


thousand (50,000) where traffic volumes have increased to become so


impaired or hazardous as to constitute a threat to the safety of


persons or property traveling over or upon such highways.


When such traffic conditions as described may arise in rural


areas, the Department of Transportation shall engage the Oklahoma


Department of Commerce, the Oklahoma Tax Commission, or other


agencies or entities of the state, as necessary, to confirm the


relationship of traffic conditions to robust economic development.


Once said such relationship is confirmed and documented, the


Department of Transportation may utilize any proceeds from the Rural


Economic Transportation Reliability and Optimization Fund in an

Req. No. 392 Page 3


amount not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the total project costs


to incentivize and leverage the acceleration and prioritization of


improvement projects existing in or to be incorporated into the


Department’s Eight-Year Construction Work Plan.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


There is hereby appropriated to the Rural Economic


Transportation Reliability and Optimization Fund created pursuant to


Section 1913 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes from any monies


not otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the


State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the sum of


Two Hundred Million Dollars ($200,000,000.00) to be utilized in


accordance with law.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-392 MSBB 12/13/2024 2:30:46 PM









Req. No. 392 Page 4